Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
188F]

WEST
HAWAII REGIONAL FISHERY MANAGEMENT AREA

Section

188F-1 Definitions

188F-2 West Hawaii regional fishery management
area;

establishment

188F-3 West Hawaii regional fishery management
area; purpose

188F-4 West Hawaii regional fishery management area
plan

188F-5 Review

188F-6 Rules

Note

L 2014, c 218, §8 purports to amend this chapter.

Cross References

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next